apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="Ll">
      <e r="LR"><i>L</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>L</l><r>l</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Mm">
      <e r="LR"><i>M</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>M</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Nn">
      <e r="LR"><i>N</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>N</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Oo">
      <e r="LR"><i>O</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>O</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Pp">
      <e r="LR"><i>P</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>P</l><r>p</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Qq">
      <e r="LR"><i>Q</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>Q</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Rr">
      <e r="LR"><i>R</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>R</l><r>r</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Ss">
      <e r="LR"><i>S</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>S</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Tt">
      <e r="LR"><i>T</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>T</l><r>t</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Uu">
      <e r="LR"><i>U</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>U</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Vv">
      <e r="LR"><i>V</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>V</l><r>v</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Ww">
      <e r="LR"><i>W</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>W</l><r>w</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Xx">
      <e r="LR"><i>X</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>X</l><r>x</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Yy">
      <e r="LR"><i>Y</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>Y</l><r>y</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="Zz">
      <e r="LR"><i>Z</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>Z</l><r>z</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        
    <pardef n="expensive__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="long/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>est</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="happ/y__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ier</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iest</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sly/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>est</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="sh/y__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ier</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iest</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>yer</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>yest</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="nice/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>r</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="big/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ger</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>gest</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="hot/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ter</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>test</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="thin/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ner</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>nest</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dim/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>mer</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>mest</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="common/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>est</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="lovel/y__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>        <l>ier</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>        <l>iest</l>        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="handsome/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>r</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/good__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>good</l>        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>better</l>        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>best</l>        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/bad__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>bad</l>        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>worse</l>        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>worst</l>        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="f/ar__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>urther</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>arther</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>urthest</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>arthest</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="glad/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>        <l>der</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>        <l>dest</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="broad/__adj">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>est</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="X-ray"><par n="Xx"/><i>-ray</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UN organisation" r="RL"><p><l><a/></l><r></r></p><par n="Uu"/><par n="Nn"/><i><b/>organisation</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Western country"><par n="Ww"/><i>estern<b/>countr</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Quran"><par n="Qq"/><i>uran</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minister for the environment"><par n="Mm"/><i>inister</i><par n="house__n"/><p><l><b/>for<b/>The<b/>Environment</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>the<b/>environment</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Tuesday night"><par n="Tt"/><i>uesday<b/>night</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="New Year's eve"><par n="Nn"/><i>ew<b/>Year's<b/>eve</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanian speaker"><par n="Rr"/><i>omanian<b/>speaker</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Spanish speaker"><par n="Ss"/><i>panish<b/>speaker</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Panamanian"><par n="Pp"/><i>anamanian</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Yugoslavian"><par n="Yy"/><i>ugoslavian</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="October"><par n="Oo"/><i>ctober</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Latin American"><par n="Ll"/><i>atin<b/>American</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Osogov"><par n="Oo"/><i>sogov</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Qatar"><par n="Qq"/><i>atar</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Transylvanian"><par n="Tt"/><i>ransylvanian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Washington"><par n="Ww"/><i>ashington</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Zagreb"><par n="Zz"/><i>agreb</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="snug"><i>snug</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Višegrad"><par n="Vv"/><i>išegrad</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="failed"><i>failed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bad"><i></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="not bad"><i>not<b/></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="heavy"><i>heav</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="good"><i></i><par n="/good__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Latvian"><par n="Ll"/><i>atvian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Norwegian"><par n="Nn"/><i>orwegian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Palestinian"><par n="Pp"/><i>alestinian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Russian"><par n="Rr"/><i>ussian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Milan"><par n="Mm"/><i>ilan</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Zemun"><par n="Zz"/><i>emun</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Sudanese"><par n="Ss"/><i>udanese</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Ukrainian"><par n="Uu"/><i>krainian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Vietnamese"><par n="Vv"/><i>ietnamese</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Yugoslavian"><par n="Yy"/><i>ugoslavian</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alive"><i>alive</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="big"><i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="broad"><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="common"><i>common</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fair"><i>fair</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geometrical"><i>geometrical</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gray"><i>gray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grey"><i>grey</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grim"><i>grim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="handsome"><i>handsome</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hot"><i>hot</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modern"><i>modern</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nice"><i>nice</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pretty"><i>prett</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proud"><i>proud</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="shy"><i>sh</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slim"><i>slim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="thin/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="timely"><i>timel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="unlikely"><i>unlikel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wet"><i>wet</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tied"><i>tied</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rude"><i>rude</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
